Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-914
Loitering about a penal institution; penalty.

(1) Any person who loiters about a penal institution in this state and engages in an unauthorized conversation with or passes any unauthorized message or messages to any inmate of such institution, or fails or refuses to leave the immediate vicinity of a penal institution when ordered to do so by a peace officer or correctional official, commits the offense of loitering about a penal institution.

(2) Loitering about a penal institution is a Class III misdemeanor.

(3) For purposes of this section, penal institution includes a jail, prison, penitentiary, house of correction, or other place of penal detention.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 199;

Laws 1995, LB 352, § 1.